Hawaii statutes.
§179-4 Powers, duties, and jurisdiction of
the board. In addition to those powers and responsibilities of the board
of land and natural resources established by existing law, the board is
authorized to implement the declared purposes of this chapter with regard to
flood control and flood water conservation in the following manner:

(1) Coordinate the programs and activities of all
agencies of the State, in conformance with the objectives of the statewide
flood control program.

(2) Compile, evaluate, interpret, and disseminate
information for technical use and for the general information and education of
the people of the State.

(3) Render technical assistance to the political
subdivisions and other agencies of the State only upon request of the affected
agencies in matters of master planning, zoning, qualifying for, and
constructing federal and state flood control projects, the training of flood
fighting units, and related flood control activities.

(4) With regard to federal flood control projects:

(A) Review plans submitted by federal
agencies for state approval and make appropriate recommendations to the
governor;

(B) Formulate and recommend to the
legislature a general policy for state participation with the political
subdivisions in the assurances of local cooperation required by federal flood
control acts;

(C) Review requests from political
subdivisions for financial assistance in meeting local participation
requirements and make appropriate recommendations to the legislature; and

(D) Execute and administer agreements with
political subdivisions to implement state assurances of participation in
federal flood control projects.

(5) For meritorious proposed projects which do not
meet feasibility standards for federal flood control projects:

(A) Formulate state feasibility criteria and
project funding procedures;

(B) Study, evaluate, and determine the
feasibility of proposed projects in accordance with established criteria and
make recommendations to the legislature;

(C) Execute and administer agreements with
political subdivisions to assure compliance with the conditions of state
projects; and

(D) Design, prepare plans and specifications,
obtain bids, let contracts, and supervise the construction of state flood
control works.

(6) With regard to projects initiated and financed
entirely by political subdivisions, render coordination and aid only if
requested by the respective agencies.

(7) With regard to state ownership of drainageways,
coordinate the resolution of drainageway maintenance problems with the
appropriate state agency or agencies.

(8) With regard to multiple jurisdiction of
drainageways, the board shall coordinate the resolution of drainageway
maintenance problems with all affected political subdivisions.

(9) With regard to certain streambeds, streambanks,
and drainageways whose ownership is not claimed nor determined, the board shall
coordinate the resolution of streambed, streambank, and drainageway maintenance
problems with the appropriate state agency or agencies.

(10) The board may promulgate rules to implement this
chapter. [L 1961, c 34, §4; am L 1963, c 148, pt of §1; Supp, §87C-4; HRS
§179-4; am L 1986, c 121, §3]

Cross References

County maintenance of streams and drainageways, see §46-11.5.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next